Tennessee, session 114, HB0868.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 2, Chapter 10, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law, a political campaign committee that is
headquartered or domiciled in another state, country, or territory shall not make a
contribution, including an in-kind contribution:
(1) To a candidate in a primary election in this state;
(2) To another political campaign committee for purposes of engaging in
activity described in subdivision (a)(1) or (a)(3); or
(3) For any other purpose with the intent of influencing a primary election
in this state.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Primary election" means a state or local primary election held in this
state for a statewide political party; and
(2) "Statewide political party" means the statewide political party in
control of both houses of the general assembly on July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0868
002570
- 1 -